Utah statutes.
35A-8-2002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Account" means the Youth Character Organization Restricted Account created in Section 35A-8-2003.

(2)  "Qualified youth character organization council" means a youth character organization council in the state that the division determines to be eligible to receive a distribution under Section 35A-8-2004.

(3)  "Youth character organization" means an organization that is chartered under 36 U.S.C. Sec. 80301.

(4)  "Youth character organization council" means a council that:

(a)  is chartered by a youth character organization;

(b)  is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code; and

(c)  covers a specified geographic area that includes a geographic area within the state.

(5)  "Youth member" means a person who:

(a)  has a valid membership in a youth character organization;

(b)  is affiliated with a particular youth character organization council; and

(c)  is 18 years of age or younger.



Enacted by Chapter 338, 2013 General Session

